src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
Noun inflection
The Old French language nouns inflect in cases.































*nouns examples:*
* *fille:* `fille+N+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *file:* `fille+N+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *fille:* `fille+N+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *file:* `fille+N+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *filles:* `fille+N+Fem+Nom+Pl`
* *files:* `fille+N+Fem+Nom+Pl`
* *filles:* `fille+N+Fem+Obl+Pl`
* *files:* `fille+N+Fem+Obl+Pl`
* *Alemaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *Alemaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *Alemaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Nom+Pl`
* *Alemaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Obl+Pl`
* *Alamaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *Alamaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *Alamaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Nom+Pl`
* *Alamaigne:* `Alemaigne+N+Prop+Fem+Obl+Pl`
* *Gieffroy:* `Gieffroy+N+Prop+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *Gieffroy:* `Gieffroy+N+Prop+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *Gieffroy:* `Gieffroy+N+Prop+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *Gieffroy:* `Gieffroy+N+Prop+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *lei:* `lei+N+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *lei:* `lei+N+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *ley:* `lei+N+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *ley:* `lei+N+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *leis:* `lei+N+Fem+Nom+Pl`
* *leis:* `lei+N+Fem+Obl+Pl`
* *loi:* `lei+N+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *loi:* `lei+N+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *loy:* `lei+N+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *loy:* `lei+N+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *lois:* `lei+N+Fem+Nom+Pl`
* *lois:* `lei+N+Fem+Obl+Pl`
* *termes:* `terme+N+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *terme:* `terme+N+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *terme:* `terme+N+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *termes:* `terme+N+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *vespre:* `vespre+N+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *vespre:* `vespre+N+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *vespre:* `vespre+N+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *vespres:* `vespre+N+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *ancestre:* `ancessor+N+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *ancessor:* `ancessor+N+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *ancessor:* `ancessor+N+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *ancessors:* `ancessor+N+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *bers:* `bers+N+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *bers:* `bers+N+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *bers:* `bers+N+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *bers:* `bers+N+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *cortiers:* `cort+N+Agent+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *corteor:* `cort+N+Agent+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *courteor:* `cort+N+Agent+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *courtiers:* `cort+N+Agent+Masc+Nom+Sg`
* *corteors:* `cort+N+Agent+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *courteors:* `cort+N+Agent+Masc+Obl+Pl`
* *cortière:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *cortière:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *cortiere:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *cortiere:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *courtière:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *courtière:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *courtiere:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *courtiere:* `cort+N+Agent+Fem+Obl+Sg`


* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fro/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
